sc_IT/sc_IT/sc_IT.dic
afannosu/D po:agetivu
allurpidu/E po:agetivu
allutu/F po:agetivu
amigu/F po:nùmene
ammamada/B po:nùmene
amministradu/D po:agetivu
amprària/A po:nùmene
amu/C po:nùmene
antigu/F po:agetivu
antzianu/E po:agetivu
arbada/B po:nùmene
arboradu/D po:agetivu
arressu/F po:agetivu
artu/eF po:agetivu
assertzione/c po:nùmene
assuddu/b po:nùmene
assutu/F po:agetivu
asussena/b po:nùmene
atarginu/D po:agetivu
atendibilidade/c po:nùmene
atentzione/A po:nùmene
atinadore/E po:agetivu
atzellerada/B po:nùmene
bagnu/C po:nùmene
bambu/F po:agetivu
bardaderu/D po:agetivu
barona/B po:nùmene
bascosu/E po:agetivu
bentre/b po:nùmene
betzu/EF po:agetivu
bibbirriu/A po:nùmene
billete/B po:nùmene
binu/C po:nùmene
birgongiosu/E po:agetivu
bitzichesu/D po:agetivu
boghe/c po:nùmene
bonu/F po:agetivu
brillu/F po:agetivu
brutu/F po:agetivu
bullunca/C po:nùmene
butadura/B po:nùmene
cadentzadu/E po:agetivu
caghinu/B po:agetivu
calamistreri/D po:agetivu
calamu/A po:nùmene
calmu/F po:agetivu
campione/B po:nùmene
caputzu/A po:nùmene
caratza/B po:nùmene
cardampuleri/D po:agetivu
cardosu/E po:agetivu
carrita/B po:nùmene
caru/F po:agetivu
casùllia/A po:nùmene
catalanizatzione/c po:nùmene
cavalcada/C po:nùmene
cavalleri/B po:nùmene
chìghinu/D po:agetivu
coàina/A po:nùmene
colletzione/b po:nùmene
colore/B po:nùmene
comascu/D po:agetivu
congiuntivite/c po:nùmene
connadu/E po:nùmene
consumadore/A po:nùmene
continuatzione/c po:nùmene
contzentratzione/c po:nùmene
cora/C po:nùmene
cordone/B po:nùmene
corte/c po:nùmene
cràchili/A po:nùmene
cremosu/E po:agetivu
criminalidade/c po:nùmene
crispu/F po:agetivu
criticadore/D po:agetivu
crochida/B po:nùmene
cuartzite/c po:nùmene
cumbentu/A po:nùmene
cumpetitzione/c po:nùmene
cunformatzione/c po:nùmene
cunnu/C po:nùmene
cuntemporaneidade/c po:nùmene
cuotidianidade/b po:nùmene
curtzu/F po:agetivu
datatzione/c po:nùmene
decàlogu/A po:nùmene
decompositzione/c po:nùmene
deletèriu/D po:agetivu
dengosu/E po:agetivu
dinare/B po:nùmene
disponìbile/A po:agetivu
divinizatzione/b po:nùmene
documentàriu/D po:agetivu
donu/C po:nùmene
drollu/F po:agetivu
eletrificatzione/b po:nùmene
emotividade/c po:nùmene
erbastulada/A po:nùmene
erboridu/E po:agetivu
esibitzione/b po:nùmene
estremuntzione/b po:nùmene
faitzione/b po:nùmene
faltosu/D po:agetivu
farsu/F po:agetivu
fatadura/C po:nùmene
fatiscu/E po:agetivu
fatzianu/B po:nùmene
fatzione/b po:nùmene
fertine/b po:nùmene
fiantzadura/A po:nùmene
figuralidade/c po:nùmene
forma/C po:nùmene
francu/F po:agetivu
frastimadore/D po:agetivu
fregnoculeddu/A po:agetivu st:fregnòculu is:+eddu
fressada/B po:nùmene
frigilidade/b po:nùmene
fritu/F po:agetivu
frue/b po:nùmene
frutu/C po:nùmene
fune/b po:nùmene
furuncu/E po:agetivu
garbosidade/b po:nùmene
gatutzu/C po:nùmene
gazella/A po:nùmene
gente/c po:nùmene
germandade/b po:nùmene
ghìrtalu/D po:agetivu
giagarada/B po:nùmene
giustidade/b po:nùmene
golfinu/C po:nùmene
graitu/E po:agetivu
grandiosidade/b po:nùmene
grapinu/A po:nùmene
grifu/F po:nùmene
grivillosidade/b po:nùmene
grussu/F po:agetivu
gulosidade/b po:nùmene
iIschematizatzione/c po:nùmene
immalitziadu/E po:agetivu
impiegu/C po:nùmene
inatividade/b po:nùmene
incheradu/D po:agetivu
ìnditze/A po:nùmene
indormigadu/E po:agetivu
infallibilidade/c po:nùmene
inseminatzione/b po:nùmene
intermediatzione/c po:nùmene
irregularidade/b po:nùmene
isassiada/B po:nùmene
isballadu/E po:agetivu
iscaddigadu/E po:agetivu
iscannu/C po:nùmene
iscantergiada/B po:nùmene
iscanzadu/D po:agetivu
iscarenadu/E po:agetivu
iscarrafione/A po:nùmene
iscassu/F po:agetivu
iscedadu/E po:agetivu
ischidonada/B po:nùmene
ischissioladu/E po:agetivu
iscilinga/C po:nùmene
isciringatzione/b po:nùmene
isciulietu/E po:agetivu
iscongiuntadu/E po:agetivu
iscoradura/B po:nùmene
iscuru/E po:agetivu
iscuta/C po:nùmene
isforrada/B po:nùmene
islogadura/A po:nùmene
ispampinadu/D po:agetivu
ispetzificatzione/c po:nùmene
istalagmite/b po:nùmene
istampu/C po:nùmene
isticu/A po:nùmene
isturrunadu/D po:agetivu
ladu/F po:agetivu
lardosu/E po:agetivu
lascu/F po:agetivu
làstimu/A po:nùmene
late/C po:nùmene
lestru/F po:agetivu
licore/B po:nùmene
lìtzitu/D po:agetivu
lorantza/A po:nùmene
lua/C po:nùmene
lughighedda/c po:nùmene
macotu/E po:agetivu
mangiufone/D po:agetivu
manintina/A po:nùmene
mannu/eFW po:agetivu
manu/bc po:nùmene
masedu/E po:agetivu
massificatzione/b po:nùmene
meighina/B po:nùmene
mele/C po:nùmene
membrana/A po:nùmene
millionàriu/D po:agetivu
minadore/E po:nùmene
montadura/A po:nùmene
mucosu/E po:agetivu
mudabilidade/c po:nùmene
mugere/B po:nùmene
mussu/C po:nùmene
mutzinadu/D po:agetivu
nennu/F po:nùmene
nie/c po:nùmene
nou/F po:agetivu
nue/bc po:nùmene
operaismu/A po:nùmene
origrone/D po:agetivu
ormonale/E po:agetivu
otada/C po:nùmene
palita/B po:nùmene
palpitatzione/c po:nùmene
paru/C po:nùmene
penitzillina/A po:nùmene
perifràsticu/D po:agetivu
peroratzione/c po:nùmene
picu/C po:nùmene
pigada/B po:nùmene
porridore/D po:agetivu
potabilizadore/A po:nùmene
pratu/BC po:nùmene
prontu/F po:agetivu
protesta/B po:nùmene
puntisicu/E po:agetivu
purpurinu/D po:agetivu
rafiguratzione/c po:nùmene
ramu/C po:nùmene
raru/F po:agetivu
ratzionalidade/b po:nùmene
reflessu/A po:nùmene
regla/B po:nùmene
reincarnatzione/b po:nùmene
rete/c po:nùmene
retza/C po:nùmene
rispetabilidade/c po:nùmene
rivalidade/b po:nùmene
rosellita/B po:nùmene
rujòngiu/D po:agetivu
rutu/F po:agetivu
sala/BC po:nùmene
satzadu/E po:agetivu
seddalitzu/A po:nùmene
seguridade/b po:nùmene
sicu/F po:agetivu
similtade/b po:nùmene
sìngulu/D po:agetivu
sirena/B po:nùmene
sutasetzione/c po:nùmene
sutiscritzione/b po:nùmene
sutzu/C po:nùmene
talpa/A po:nùmene
tedescu/D po:agetivu
tenda/C po:nùmene
togu/F po:agetivu
tostada/B po:nùmene
traba/C po:nùmene
trempoddudu/D po:agetivu
tribordu/A po:nùmene
trucu/C po:nùmene
tundu/F po:agetivu
tzerimoniosu/E po:agetivu
tzirrigosu/D po:agetivu
tzitziu/B po:nùmene
tzìulu/A po:nùmene
tzucu/C po:nùmene
ufitzialidade/c po:nùmene
